Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Revision of title. —

Laws 1982, ch. 75, as amended by Laws 1983, ch. 171, revised this title.

Section 1, ch. 75, Laws 1982 renumbered §§

6-5-302

, 6-8-507, 6-8-509 and

6-9-201

through

6-9-203

as §§

35-6-116

,

18-4-107

,

18-4-108

and

40-16-101

through

40-16-103

. Section 2 of that act amended three sections of the code outside of Title 6. Section 3 of that act repealed former §§

6-1-101

through 6-12-109 and created present §§

6-1-101

through

6-10-203

. Section 4 of that act amended and renumbered former § 31-5-1117 as §

6-2-106

. Section 5 of that act repealed numerous sections throughout the code.

Section 1, ch. 171, Laws 1983, amended many of the sections created by § 3, ch. 75, Laws 1982. Section 2 of that act amended present §§

6-6-301

through

6-6-307

, amended and renumbered into Title 6 by § 2, ch. 62, Laws 1982. Section 3, ch. 171, Laws 1983, amended § 5, ch. 75, Laws 1982, repealing numerous sections throughout the code. Section 4, ch. 171, Laws 1983, amended §

31-11-102

. Section 5 of that act amended and renumbered § 31-5-1117 as §

6-2-106

and §

37-12-123

as §

6-3-409

. Section 6 of that act repealed § 4, ch. 75, Laws 1982. Section 7, ch. 171, Laws 1983, repealed §§

6-1-104

and

6-3-803

, as enacted by § 3, ch. 75, Laws 1983.

Section 6, ch. 75, Laws 1982, and § 8, ch. 171, Laws 1983, make the revision of this title effective on July 1, 1983.

No detailed comparison of the changes made by the revision has been made, but, where appropriate, historical citations to former provisions have been added to corresponding sections in this title and annotations from cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections in this title where it was felt that they would be helpful. For tables of comparative sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision that the penal code shall be framed on the humane principles of reformation and prevention, see art. 1, § 15, Wyo. Const.

For provision that a person who has been convicted of a felony or other high crime is not competent to act as juror, see §

1-11-102

.

As to habeas corpus, see §§

1-27-101

to

1-27-134

.

As to criminal procedure generally, see title 7.

As to the division of criminal investigation of the office of attorney general, see §§

9-1-611

to

9-1-620

.

As to the criminal identification division of the office of the attorney general, see §§

9-1-623

to

9-1-627

.

For offenses concerning livestock and other animals, see §§

11-30-104

,

11-30-106

through

11-30-115

.

For crimes, offenses and penalties as to banks, banking and finance, see §§

13-10-101

to

13-10-112

.

For provisions as to military courts and crimes, see §§

19-12-101

et seq.

For offenses and penalties as to elections, see §§

22-26-101

to

22-26-121

.

For provisions as to enforcement and penalties of game and fish laws generally, see §§

23-6-101

to

23-6-208

.

For enforcement and penalties under the Uniform Act Regulating Traffic on Highways, see §§

31-5-1201

to

31-5-1214

.

For crimes and offenses as to public health and safety, see §§

35-10-101

to

35-10-409

.

For crimes and offenses as to public utilities, see §§

37-12-101

to

37-12-213

.

As to criminal rules, see Rule 1, W.R.Cr.P. et seq.

As to criminal forms, see Appendix of Forms, W.R. Cr. P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Regulation of astrology, clairvoyancy, fortune-telling and the like, 91 ALR3d 766.